Washington statutes.
RCW 35.81.030

Encouragement of private enterprise.

A municipality, to the greatest extent it determines to be feasible in carrying out the provisions of this chapter, shall afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the needs of the municipality as a whole, to the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the community renewal area by private enterprise. A municipality shall give consideration to this objective in exercising its powers under this chapter, including the formulation of a workable program, the approval of community renewal plans (consistent with the comprehensive plan or parts thereof for the municipality), the exercise of its zoning powers, the enforcement of other laws, codes and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements, the disposition of any property acquired, and the provision of necessary public improvements.

[ 2002 c 218 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.81.030. Prior: 1957 c 42 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—Construction—2002 c 218: See notes following RCW 35.81.005.